Utah statutes.
7-1-319.   Notice to county attorney or district attorney of criminal
violations -- Attorney general to conduct actions commenced by commissioner --
Assistance of county attorney or district attorney.
The commissioner shall inform the county attorney or district attorney in the
county in which the principal office of an institution is located of any
violation of any provision of law which constitutes a misdemeanor or felony by
an officer, director, or employee of any institution under his jurisdiction
which shall come to his notice, and upon receipt of such information the
county attorney or district attorney shall institute proceedings to enforce
the provisions of the law. The attorney general shall conduct all actions,
suits, and proceedings begun by the commissioner under authority of law and
may call to his assistance the county attorney or district attorney of the
county in which the action, suit, or proceeding is conducted, and it shall be
the duty of the county attorney or district attorney to render such assistance
as the attorney general may require.
